Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.311, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. deleted text begin Swimming or bathing areasdeleted text end new text begin Unauthorized operationnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A person may not operate a watercraft within a water area that has been marked off or set aside as a swimming or bathing area as prescribed by the commissioner's rules. new text begin (b) A person may not operate a watercraft: new text end new text begin (1) in or through an uncultivated wild rice bed unless the watercraft is propelled by hand, such as a skiff or canoe; or new text end new text begin (2) at greater than slow-no-wake speed within 150 feet of an uncultivated wild rice bed. new text end